Illinois, session 104th, SB1550.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Library System Act is amended by 5changing Section 8 as follows: 6    (75 ILCS 10/8)  (from Ch. 81, par. 118)7    Sec. 8. State grants. 8    (a) There shall be a program of State grants within the 9limitations of funds appropriated by the Illinois General 10Assembly together with other funds made available by the 11federal government or other sources for this purpose. This 12program of State grants shall be administered by the State 13Librarian in accordance with rules and regulations as provided 14in Section 3 of this Act and shall include the following: (i) 15annual equalization grants; (ii) Library System grants; (iii) 16per capita grants to public libraries; and (iv) planning and 17construction grants to public libraries and library systems 18and public libraries that are . Libraries, in order to be 19eligible for grants under this Section, must be members of a 20library system; and (v) grants to improve or enhance security 21of libraries.22    (b) An annual equalization grant shall be made to all 23public libraries for which the corporate authorities levy a   SB1550 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 09720 RTM 19786 b1tax for library purposes at a rate not less than .13% of the 2value of all the taxable property as equalized and assessed by 3the Department of Revenue if the amount of tax revenue 4obtained from a rate of .13% produces less than $17.50 per 5capita in property tax revenue from property taxes for Fiscal 6Year 2025 and thereafter. In that case, the State Librarian is 7authorized to make an equalization grant equivalent to the 8difference between the amount obtained from a rate of .13% and 9an annual income of $17.50 per capita for grants made in Fiscal 10Year 2025 and thereafter. If moneys appropriated for grants 11under this Section are not sufficient, then the State 12Librarian shall reduce the per capita amount of the grants so 13that the qualifying public libraries receive the same amount 14per capita, but in no event shall the grant be less than 15equivalent to the difference between the amount of the tax 16revenue obtained from the current levy and an annual income of 17$4.25 per capita. If a library receiving an equalization grant 18reduces its tax levy below the amount levied at the time the 19original application is approved, it shall be ineligible to 20receive further equalization grants.21    If a library is subject to the Property Tax Extension 22Limitation Law in the Property Tax Code and its tax levy for 23library purposes has been lowered to a rate of less than .13%, 24the library will qualify for this grant if the library levied a 25tax for library purposes that met the requirements for this 26grant in the previous year and if the tax levied for library   SB1550 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 09720 RTM 19786 b1purposes in the current year produces tax revenue for the 2library that is an increase over the previous year's extension 3of 5% or the percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index, 4whichever is less, and the tax revenue produced by this levy is 5less than $17.50 per capita in property tax revenue from 6property taxes for the Fiscal Year 2025 and thereafter. In 7this case, the State Librarian is authorized to make an 8equalization grant equivalent to the difference between the 9amount of tax revenue obtained from the current levy and an 10annual income of $17.50 per capita for grants made in Fiscal 11Year 2025 and thereafter. If moneys appropriated for grants 12under this Section are not sufficient, then the State 13Librarian shall reduce the per capita amount of the grants so 14that the qualifying public libraries receive the same amount 15per capita, but in no event shall the grant be less than 16equivalent to the difference between the amount of the tax 17revenue obtained from the current levy and an annual income of 18$4.25 per capita. If a library receiving an equalization grant 19reduces its tax levy below the amount levied at the time the 20original application is approved, it shall be ineligible to 21receive further equalization grants.22    (c) Annual Library System grants shall be made, upon 23application, to each library system approved by the State 24Librarian on the following basis:25        (1) For library systems, the sum of $1.46 per capita 26    of the population of the area served plus the sum of $50.75   SB1550 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 09720 RTM 19786 b1    per square mile or fraction thereof of the area served 2    except as provided in paragraph (4) of this subsection.3        (2) If the amounts appropriated for grants are 4    different from the amount provided for in paragraph (1) of 5    this subsection, the area and per capita funding shall be 6    proportionately reduced or increased accordingly.7        (3) For library systems, additional funds may be 8    appropriated. The appropriation shall be distributed on 9    the same proportional per capita and per square mile basis 10    as provided in paragraphs (1) and (4) of this subsection.11        (4) Per capita and area funding for a multitype 12    library system as defined in subparagraph (3) of the 13    definition of "library system" in Section 2 and a public 14    library system in cities with a population of 500,000 or 15    more as defined in subparagraph (2) of the definition of 16    "library system" in Section 2 shall be apportioned with 17    25% of the funding granted to the multitype library system 18    and 75% of the funding granted to the public library 19    system.20    (d) The "area served" for the purposes of making and 21expending annual Library System grants means the area that 22lies within the geographic boundaries of the library system as 23approved by the State Librarian, except that grant funding 24awarded to a library system may also be expended for the 25provision of services to members of other library systems if 26such an expenditure is included in a library system's plan of   SB1550 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 09720 RTM 19786 b1service and is approved by the State Librarian. In determining 2the population of the area served by the library system, the 3Illinois State Library shall use the latest federal census for 4the political subdivisions in the area served.5    (e) In order to be eligible for a grant under this Section, 6the corporate authorities, instead of a tax levy at a 7particular rate, may provide an amount equivalent to the 8amount produced by that levy.9(Source: P.A. 103-588, eff. 7-1-24.)